Indiana, session 2026, HB1053.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-24-5.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.8. (a) This section applies only
to a parcel of real property that is:
(1) in violation of a building code or ordinance of a
consolidated city at the time the parcel of real property is
made available for tax sale under this chapter; and
(2) located in a consolidated city.
This section does not apply to a parcel of real property that is used
as a principal place of residence and received a homestead
standard deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37 for the most recent
assessment date.
(b) A county treasurer may require the purchaser of a tax sale
certificate to provide the county treasurer with a remediation plan
describing how the purchaser will bring the parcel of real property
into compliance with the building code or ordinance after the
redemption period ends.
2026 IN 1053—LS 6285/DI 129


(c) A county treasurer must designate the parcels of real
property subject to subsection (b) prior to a sale under section 5 of
this chapter. Subsection (b) may apply to not more than five
percent (5%) of the total number of parcels listed for sale under
section 5 of this chapter. The redevelopment commission may assist
the county treasurer in designating the parcels of real property
subject to subsection (b).
(d) A county treasurer may offer for sale the parcels of real
property subject to subsection (b) as a separate part of a regularly
scheduled sale under section 5 of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-25-21 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) This section applies to a parcel of real
property that is:
(1) sold under IC 6-1.1-24-5.8(b); and
(2) in violation of a building code or ordinance of a
consolidated city at the time a tax deed is issued for the parcel
of real property.
(b) A county auditor must include language in the tax deed
requiring the purchaser to remedy any violations of a building
code or ordinance on the parcel of real property not later than
eighteen (18) months after the date the tax deed is issued by the
county auditor.
(c) If a purchaser fails to remedy any violations of a building
code or ordinance under subsection (b), the parcel of real property
is subject to forfeiture.
(d) Before January 1, 2027, and before each January 1
thereafter, the county executive shall provide an annual report
concerning the remediation program established by this section
and IC 6-1.1-24-5.8 to the legislative council in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6.
2026 IN 1053—LS 6285/DI 129